California, session 20252026, AB2562.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11832.8 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11832.8. (a) An alcohol or other drug program shall adopt policies and procedures that are consistent with this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.(b) All policies and procedures shall be kept in an operation manual and address and include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) Admission and discharge.(2) Client rights.(3) Services.(4) Medications.(5) Staff and client code of conduct.(6) Suicide prevention plan.SEC. 2. Section 11834.26 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11834.26. (a) The licensee shall provide at least one of the following nonmedical services:(1) Recovery services.(2) Treatment services.(3) Detoxification services.(b) The department shall adopt regulations requiring records and procedures that are appropriate for each of the services specified in subdivision (a). The records and procedures may include all of the following:(1) Admission criteria.(2) Intake process.(3) Assessments.(4) Recovery, treatment, or detoxification planning.(5) Referral.(6)  Documentation of provision of recovery, treatment, or detoxification services.(7) Discharge and continuing care planning.(8) Indicators of recovery, treatment, or detoxification outcomes.(c) A licensee shall not deny admission to any individual based solely on either of the following:(1) The individual having a valid prescription from a licensed health care professional for a medication approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for the purpose of narcotic replacement treatment or medication-assisted treatment of substance use disorders.(2) The individual having consumed, used, or otherwise been under the influence of alcohol or other drugs, as these circumstances represent symptoms of the condition of substance use disorders.(d) A licensee shall develop a plan to address when a resident relapses, including when a resident is on the licensed premises after using alcohol or other drugs.(1) The plan shall include details of how the treatment stay and treatment plan of the resident will be adjusted to address the relapse episode and how the resident will be treated and supervised while under the influence of alcohol or other drugs, as well as discharge and continuing care planning, including when a licensee determines that a resident requires services beyond the scope of the licensee.(2) This subdivision does not require a licensee to discharge a resident, as relapse, lapses, and momentary reengagement with alcohol or other drugs are symptoms of the condition of substance use disorders.(3) In developing a plan pursuant to this subdivision, the licensee shall prioritize the individual maintaining some level of connection to treatment and shall consider options to avoid complete disconnection of the resident from treatment.(e) The department shall have the authority to implement subdivisions (d) and (f) by bulletin or all-county or all-provider letter, after stakeholder input, until regulations are promulgated. The department shall promulgate regulations to implement subdivisions (d) and (f) no later than July 1, 2027.(f) (1) A licensee shall, at all times, maintain at least two unexpired doses of naloxone hydrochloride, or any other opioid antagonist that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for treatment of an opioid overdose, on the premises and shall, at all times, have at least one staff member on the premises who knows the specific location of the naloxone hydrochloride, or other opioid antagonist that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for treatment of an opioid overdose, and who has been trained on the administration of naloxone hydrochloride, or the other opioid antagonist that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for treatment of an opioid overdose, in accordance with the training requirements set forth by the department. Proof of completion of training on the administration of naloxone hydrochloride, or other opioid antagonist that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for treatment of an opioid overdose, shall be documented in the staff member’s individual personnel file.(2) A trained staff member shall not be liable for damages in a civil action or subject to criminal prosecution for the administration, in good faith, of naloxone hydrochloride, or any other opioid antagonist that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for treatment of an opioid overdose, to a person appearing to experience an overdose. This paragraph shall not apply in a case where the person who renders emergency care treatment by the use of naloxone hydrochloride, or any other opioid antagonist that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for treatment of an overdose, acts with gross negligence or engages in willful and wanton misconduct.(g) (1) A licensee shall develop a suicide prevention plan.(2) The department shall have the authority to implement paragraph (1) by bulletin or all-county or all-provider letter, after stakeholder input, until regulations are promulgated. The department shall promulgate regulations to implement paragraph (1) no later than January 1, 2031.(g)(h) In the development of regulations implementing this section, the written record requirements shall be modified or adapted for social model programs.SECTION 1.Section 11834.38 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11834.38.A license suspended pursuant to this chapter may be reinstated pursuant to Section 11522 of the Government Code.